src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-kutsua_01

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! kutsun
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%^LCnsV3	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%^LCnsV3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:%>%^WCnstAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%^WCns	#   ;

:i IndPrt ;
!1+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsimma     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsitta     #   ;
+Dial/Lauk+Ind+Prt+Pl3:ivat     K_V   ;
+Dial/Soik+Ind+Prt+Pl3:it     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>%^WCnsttii     K_V   ;
!+V+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:%>%^WCnsttu         #   ;

:n PotPers ; !
+Pot+4:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1nOÖ1OÖ1 K_V   ;
!+V+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

 CondPers ; ! kutsuisin
! +V+Cond+4:oltais      #   ;
! !+V+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
 ImprtPers_k ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%>%^WCns      #   ;
+Imprt+4:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kkOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:%>%^WCns                #   ;
! 
 V-actor_jA ;
 V-ActPrsPrc   ; !kutsuva
 V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; ! kutsunt
+PrsPrc:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1    A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:%>%^WCnsttUY1 	A-kova   ;
+Inf+Der/tOin:mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! kutsumatoin
! 
+Inf:%>AÄ1             #   ; ! antaa
+Inf:mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! antamaa
+Inf:mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+Ger:e SG-INE   ;
+Ger:je SG-INE   ;
+Ger:ee SG-INE   ;
+Der/miin:mi N-inmihiin ; !kutsumiin
+Der/min:mi N-mehiläin ; !kutsumin

! kirjuttaa:
LEXICON V-kirjuttaa
+V: V-kirjuttaa_01 ;

LEXICON V-kirjuttaa_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:AÄ1%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! kirjutan
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:AÄ1%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:AÄ1%>V3	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:AÄ1%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:AÄ1%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:AÄ1%>V3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:AÄ1%>%^WCns	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+4+ConNeg:e%>%^WCnstAÄ1	#   ;

:%^TSi IndPrt ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^TSi%>%^WCnsn       #   ; ! kirjutin
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^TSi%>%^WCnst       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^TSi        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^TSi%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^TSi%>%^WCnsttAÄ1     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^TSi%>it     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^TSi%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:e%>%^WCnsttii     K_V   ;
+Ind+Prt+4:e%>%^WCnsttii     #   ;
!+Ind+ConNeg+Prt:e%>%^WCnsttu         #   ;
:AÄ1n  PotPers ; !kirjuttanen
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
+Pot+ConNeg:%>AÄ1%>ne                #   ;
+Pot+4+ConNeg:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1%>ne                #   ;

:AÄ1 CondPers ; ! kirjuttaisin
+Cond+Pl3:e%^WCnsttAÄ1is      K   ;
+Cond+4:e%^WCnsttAÄ1is      K   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo        #   ;
+Cond+ConNeg+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1is        #   ;
! 
+V:AÄ1k ImprtPers_k ;
+Imprt+Sg2:AÄ1%^WCns      #   ;
! !+Imprt+Pl3:olisivat     #   ; ! laa ovat
+Imprt+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kAÄ1AÄ1 K_V   ;
+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl:%>kOÖ1                #   ;
+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:%>%^WCns                #   ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:%>AÄ1%>kOÖ1                #   ;
+Imprt+4:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kOÖ1OÖ1                #   ;
+Imprt+4+ConNeg:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1kOÖ1                #   ;
! 
:AÄ1 V-actor_jA ; ! kirjuttaja
:AÄ1 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! kirjuttava
:AÄ1 V-ActPrtPrc_nt ; !kirjuttant
+PrsPrc:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1vAÄ1 A-tulova   ;
+PrtPrc:e%>%^WCnsttUY1	A-kova   ;
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:AÄ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! kirjuttamatoin

! 
+Inf:AÄ1AÄ1             #   ; ! kirjuttaa
+Use/Sub+Inf+Ill:AÄ1mAÄ1AÄ1 K ; !kirjuttamaa
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1  SG-ILL_V   ; ! kirjuttammaa
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-INE ;
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ELA ;
+Inf:AÄ1mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ; !kirjuttamata
+Ger:AÄ1es		#   ;
+Ger:AÄ1jes		#   ;
+Der/miin:AÄ1mi%>%^LCns N-inmihiin ; !kirjuttammiin
+Der/miin:AÄ1mi N-inmihiin ; !kirjuttammiin

!tulla:tul
LEXICON V-tulla
+V: V-tulla_01 ;

LEXICON V-tulla_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%^LCnsOÖ1OÖ1 K_V ; !%>%^LCns%^LVws	#   ; !tulloo
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%^LCnsOÖ1%>V3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:t%>%^WCnsAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e	#   ;

:i IndPrt ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%^WCnsin       #   ; ! oon
!+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%^WCnsit       #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i        K_V   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%^WCnsimma     #   ;
!+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%^WCnsitta     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>vAÄ1t     K_V   ; ! tulivat
+Ind+Prt+4:%>tii     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t         #   ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+4:%>%^WCnstUY1         #   ;

:en PotPers ; !
+Pot+4:tAÄ1nOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
+Pot+4+ConNeg:tAÄ1ne      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

 CondPers ; ! tulisin
+Cond+4:tAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
 ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+Imprt+4:tAÄ1kOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:i V-actor_jA ; !
:OÖ1 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! tulova
:e V-ActPrsPrc ; ! tulova
 V-ActPrtPrc_lt    ; ! tult
+PrsPrc:tAÄ1vAÄ1    A-tulova   ; ! tultava
+PrtPrc:tUY1 	    A-kova   ; !tultu
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:OÖ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! tulomatoin
! 
+Inf:tAÄ1%>%^WCns              #   ; ! tulla
+Inf:emAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! tulomaa
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
! +Ger:ollees		#   ;
+Der/miin:OÖ1mi N-inmihiin ; ! tulomiin
+Der/miin:emi N-inmihiin ; ! tulomiin !!

!ommella:ompel
LEXICON V-ommella
+V: V-ommella_01 ;

LEXICON V-ommella_01
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! oon
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>%^WCnst	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%^LCnsOÖ1OÖ1 K_V ; !%>%^LCns%^LVws	#   ; !tulloo
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>%^WCnsmmAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>%^WCnsttAÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%^LCnsOÖ1%>V3t	K_V   ;
+Ind+Prs+4:t%>%^WCnsAÄ1AÄ1	#   ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e	#   ;

:i IndPrt ;
+Ind+Prt+4:%^WGStemtii     #   ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:t         #   ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+4:%^WGStemtUY1         #   ;

:en PotPers ; !
!+Pot+4:ollaa      #   ;
!+Pot+ConNeg:oo                #   ;

 CondPers ; ! tulisin
+Cond+4:%^WGStemtAÄ1is      #   ;
! !+Cond+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:%^WGStem ImprtPers_k ;
! +Imprt+Sg2:oo      #   ;
+Imprt+4:%^WGStemtAÄ1kOÖ1OÖ1      #   ;
! !+Imprt+ConNeg:oo                #   ;
! 
:i V-actor_jA ; !
:OÖ1 V-ActPrsPrc ; ! tulova
:e V-ActPrsPrc ; ! tulova
:%^WGStem V-ActPrtPrc_lt    ; ! tult
+PrsPrc:%^WGStemtAÄ1vAÄ1    A-tulova   ; ! tultava
+PrtPrc:%^WGStemtUY1 	    A-kova   ; !tultu
+V+Inf+Der/tOin:OÖ1mAÄ1t A-kalatoin ; ! tulomatoin
! 
+Inf:%^WGStemlAÄ1%>%^WCns              #   ; ! ommella only _ll_
+Inf:emAÄ1  SG-ILL_V  ; ! tulomaa
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-INE   ;
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ELA   ;
+Inf:OÖ1mAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+Inf:emAÄ1 SG-ABE   ;
+Ger:%^WGStemlees		#   ;
+Der/miin:OÖ1mi N-inmihiin ; ! ompelemiin
+Der/miin:emi N-inmihiin ; ! ompelemmiin


! nähä:nä
LEXICON V-nähä
+V: V-nähä_01 ;
