src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
nähä:nä V-nähä  "" ;
tehä:te V-nähä  "" ;
kirjuttaa:kirjutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
issuttaa:issutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
itettää:itett V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
viheltää:vihelt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
veeruittaa:veeruitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
veeruittaa:vieruitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
veeruittaa:viiruitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
janottaa:janott V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
kuvattaa:kuvatt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
osoittaa:osoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
otraƶoittaa:otraƶoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
nagrattaa:nagratt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
tuiskuttaa:tuiskutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
treebuittaa:treebuitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
sekkoittaa:sekkoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
uuvvistaa:uuvvist V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
parentaa:parent V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
syventää:sevent V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
aloittaa:aloitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
leekuttaa:leekutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
leekuttaa:liekutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
leekuttaa:liikutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
opettaa:opett V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
hämärtää:hämärt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
unnohtaa:unnoht V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
mukkoittaa:mukkoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
pakaistaa:pakaist V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
meşaittaa:meşaitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
kalastaa:kalast V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
tiijustaa:tiijust V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
tiijystää:tiijyst V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
kaivertaa:kaivert V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
hävittää:hävitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
hämmentää:hämment V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
helpoittaa:helpoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
harottaa:harott V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
eroittaa:eroitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
erittää:eritt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
alottaa:alott V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
parentaa:parent V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
rinnoittaa:rinnoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
avittaa:avitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
rajoittaa:rajoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
lopettaa:lopett V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
erroittaa:erroitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
yhistää:yhist V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
painuttaa:painutt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
tarkastaa:tarkast V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
praavittaa:praavitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
vahvistaa:vahvist V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
toimittaa:toimitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
ƶaarittaa:ƶaaritt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
ƶaalivoittaa:ƶaalivoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
mukkoittaa:mukkoitt V-kirjuttaa  "" ;
tulla:tul V-tulla  "" ;
ommella:ompel V-ommella  "" ;
kuunnella:kuuntel V-ommella  "" ;
katsella:katsel V-ommella  "" ;
ootella:oottel V-ommella  "" ;
petellä:pettel V-ommella  "" ;
näytellä:näytel V-ommella  "" ;
söötellä:sööttel V-ommella  "" ;
koolla:kool V-tulla  "" ;
tuulla:tuul V-tulla  "" ;
kuulla:kuul V-tulla  "" ;
noissa:nois V-tulla  "" ;
männä:män V-tulla  "" ;
